ja: ステアリングラック位置: フロント; リア; その他
de: Position des Lenkgetriebes: Vorne; Hinten; Andere
sv: Position för styrstång: Fram; Bak; Övrigt
pt-PT: Posição da cremalheira de direção: Frente; Traseira; Outro
nb: Posisjon for rattstamme: Foran; Bak; Annet
it: Posizione della cremagliera dello sterzo: Anteriore; Posteriore; Altro
vi: Vị trí của thước lái: Phía trước; Phía sau; Khác
hu: Kormánymű elhelyezkedése: Első; Hátsó; Egyéb
sk-SK: Poloha hrebeňa riadenia: Predná časť; Zadná časť; Iné
ru: Положение рулевой рейки: Передняя; Задняя; Другое
nl: Stuurhuispositie: Voor; Achter; Overig
zh-TW: 轉向架位置: 前方; 後方; 其他
fr: Position de la crémaillère de direction: Avant; Arrière; Autre
hr-HR: Položaj letve upravljača: Prednja; Stražnja; Ostalo
ko: 스티어링 랙 위치: 전면; 후면; 기타
zh-CN: 转向齿条位置: 前部; 后部; 其他
ro-RO: Poziție a casetei de direcție: Față; Spate; Altele
th: ตำแหน่งของแร็คพวงมาลัย: ด้านหน้า; ด้านหลัง; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Позиция на кормилната рейка: Отпред; Отзад; Друго
tr: Direksiyon kremayer konumu: Ön; Arka; Diğer
en: Steering rack position: Front; Rear; Other
da: Placering af tandstang: For; Bag; Andet
sl-SI: Položaj krmilnega droga: Spredaj; Zadaj; Drugo
pt-BR: Posicionamento da barra de direção: Dianteira; Traseira; Outro
cs: Pozice řídicího hřebenu: Přední; Zadní; Jiné
el: Θέση ράβδου διεύθυνσης: Εμπρός; Πίσω; Άλλο
lt-LT: Vairo mechanizmo padėtis: Priekis; Galas; Kita
es: Posición de la cremallera de dirección: Frontal; Posterior; Otro
pl: Położenie przekładni kierowniczej: Przód; Tył; Inna
fi: Ohjaustelineen asento: Etu; Taka; Muu